South Dakota, session 2026, SB97.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-13-35 be AMENDED:
10-13-35. This section does not apply to school districts. The total amount of
revenue payable from taxes on real property within a taxing district, excluding the levy
pursuant to § 10-13-36, may increase no more than the lesser of three percent or the
index factor, as defined in § 10-13-38, over the amount of revenue payable from taxes
on real property in the preceding year, excluding the amount of taxes levied pursuant to
§ 10-13-36.
After applying the index factor, a taxing district may increase the revenue payable
from taxes on real property above the limitations provided by this section by the
percentage increase of value resulting from any improvements or change in use of real
property, annexation, minor boundary changes, and any adjustments in taxation of
property separately classified and subject to statutory adjustments and reductions under
chapters 10-4, 10-6, 10-6A, and 10-6B, except § 10-6-113, only if assessed the same as
property of equal value growth factor. For taxes payable in 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, and
2031, an increase in revenue payable to a taxing district allowed under this paragraph
may not exceed three five percent:
(1) For a taxing district where the growth factor is no greater than three percent, the
percentage increase in revenue payable to the taxing district allowed under this
paragraph is equal to the growth factor;
(2) For a taxing district where the growth factor is greater than three percent, the
percentage increase in revenue payable to the taxing district allowed under this
paragraph is equal to the sum of:
(a) Three percent; and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

97G 2 97
(b) Sixty percent of the amount of the growth factor in excess of three percent.
A taxing district may increase the revenue it receives from taxes on real property
above the limit provided by this section for taxes levied to pay the principal, interest, and
redemption charges on any bonds which are subject to referendum, scheduled payment
increases on bonds, for a levy directed by the order of a court for the purpose of paying a
judgment against the taxing district, upon the termination of a tax increment financing
district pursuant to § 11-9-46, or upon the application of any discretionary formula to real
property pursuant to § 10-6-137. Any taxing district created after the effective date of
this section is exempt from the limitation provided by this section for a period of two years
immediately following its creation.
For purposes of this section, an increase in value resulting from an improvement
made to an owner-occupied single-family dwelling does not include additions to, or
improvements of, existing structures affixed to land that result in an increase in value of
forty percent or less to the owner-occupied single-family dwelling.
For purposes of this section, "growth factor" means the percentage increase of
value resulting from any improvements or change in use of real property, annexation,
minor boundary changes, and any adjustments in taxation of property separately classified
and subject to statutory adjustments and reductions under chapters 10-4, 10-6, 10-6A,
and 10-6B, except § 10-6-113, only if assessed the same as property of equal value.
Section 2. That § 13-16-7 be AMENDED:
13-16-7. The school board of any school district of this state may at the board's
discretion authorize an annual levy of a tax not to exceed three dollars per thousand
dollars of taxable valuation on the taxable valuation of the district for the capital outlay
fund for assets as defined by § 13-16-6 or for the district's obligations under a resolution,
lease-purchase agreement, capital outlay certificate, or other arrangement with the Health
and Educational Facilities Authority. Taxes collected pursuant to the levy may be
irrevocably pledged by the school board to the payment of principal of and interest on
installment purchase contracts or capital outlay certificates entered into or issued pursuant
to § 13-16-6 or 13-16-6.2 or lease-purchase agreements or other arrangement with the
Health and Educational Facilities Authority and, so long as any capital outlay certificates
are outstanding, installment agreement payments, lease-purchase agreements, or other
arrangements are unpaid, the school board of any district may be compelled by mandamus
or other appropriate remedy to levy an annual tax sufficient to pay principal and interest
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

97G 3 97
thereon, but not to exceed the three dollars per thousand dollars of taxable valuation in
any year authorized to be levied hereby.
The total amount of revenue payable from the levy provided in this section may
not increase annually by more than the lesser of three percent or the index factor, as
defined in § 10-13-38, over the maximum amount of revenue that could have been
generated from the taxes payable in 2016. Starting with taxes payable in 2021, the total
amount of revenue payable from the levy provided in this section may not increase
annually by more than three percent over the amount of revenue that could have been
raised in the prior year.
After applying three percent, a school district may increase the revenue payable
from taxes on real property above the limitations provided by this section by the
percentage increase of value resulting from any improvements or change in use of real
property, annexation, minor boundary changes, and any adjustments in taxation of real
property separately classified and subject to statutory adjustments and reductions under
chapters 10-4, 10-6, 10-6A, and 10-6B, except § 10-6-113, only if assessed the same as
property of equal value. For taxes payable in 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, and 2031, an
increase in revenue payable to a school district allowed under this paragraph may not
exceed three five percent.
A school district may increase the revenue the district receives from taxes on real
property above the limit provided by this section for taxes levied to pay the principal,
interest, and redemption charges on any bonds issued after January 1, 2009, which are
subject to referendum, scheduled payment increases on bonds, for a levy directed by the
order of a court for the purpose of paying a judgment against the school district, upon the
termination of a tax increment financing district pursuant to § 11-9-46, or upon the
application of any discretionary formula to real property pursuant to § 10-6-137. Any
school district created or reorganized after January 1, 2016, is exempt from the limitation
provided by this section for a period of two years immediately following the district's
creation.
In no year may the annual tax levy provided in this section exceed three dollars
per thousand dollars of taxable valuation of the school district for the current year.
For purposes of this section, an increase in value resulting from an improvement
made to an owner-occupied single-family dwelling does not include additions to, or
improvements of, existing structures affixed to land that result in an increase in value of
forty percent or less to the owner-occupied single-family dwelling.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.